District of Columbia statutes.
42-1016

Execution of trust powers for benefit of creditors and assignees.

The execution in whole or in part of any trust power may be decreed in equity for the benefit of the creditors or assignees of any person entitled to compel its execution when the interest of the objects of such trust is assignable.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1052
1981 Ed., § 45-116.
1973 Ed., § 45-1016.